Utah statutes.
48-2c-100.   Scope of chapter.

Until this chapter is repealed January 1, 2016, this chapter applies only to a limited liability company formed on or before December 31, 2013, that has not elected to be governed by Chapter 3a, Utah Revised Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, as provided in Section 48-3a-1405.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

